Louisiana, session 2026, SB514.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 2:1(15), (16), and (17), 2.1(B)(1), 5, 6(B)(1), 7, 7.1, 8, 9, 10, 13, 14,
81 through 87, 131(A), 135.1(F), (G), (H), (J), and (L)(1), 135.2, 135.3(A) and (B),
135.4(B), 136, 331(A), 381, 382, 383, 384, 385(A) and (B), 386 (A) and (B), and the
Page 1 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
introductory paragraph of 386(C), 390, 601(5) and (6), 607(B), 609(2), 801 through 809, 811
through 814, 901, 902, 903(A) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 2:2.1(B)(2)(p),
(G), (H), and (I) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1. Definitions
For the purposes of this Title, the following definitions shall apply:
* * *
(15) "Department" or "Department of Public Works" means the Department
of Transportation and Development, except where the Department of Public Safety
and Corrections is specified office of multimodal commerce.
(16) "Director" means the Assistant Secretary Aviation director of
aeronautics, office of multimodal commerce, aeronautics division, Louisiana
Department of Transportation and Development.
(17) "Fixed-base operator" or "FBO" means an individual or a firm operating
at an airport and providing general aircraft or air cargo services including, but not
limited to sale of fuel, maintenance, storage, repair, and ground and flight
instructions.
* * *
§2.1. Louisiana Advanced Aviation and Drone Advisory Committee
* * *
B.(1) The secretary of the Department of Transportation and Development
commissioner of multimodal commerce shall create the Louisiana Advanced
Aviation and Drone Advisory Committee and it shall be comprised of fifteen
members. The members shall be selected by the following individuals as a means of
representing a diverse set of stakeholders involved in the deployment and
advancement of drone technologies in the state. The committee shall provide
recommendations to the secretary of the Department of Transportation and
Development commissioner of multimodal commerce as well as both the House
Committee on Transportation, Highways and Public Works and the Senate
Committee on Transportation, Highways and Public Works on policy and regulatory
Page 2 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
issues related to the adoption of drone technologies.
(2) The members shall be appointed by the following groups or individuals:
* * *
(p) One member from the governor's office of homeland security and
emergency preparedness appointed by the director.
* * *
G. Advanced aeronautics functions of the department
(1) The functions of the office of multimodal commerce aeronautics
division within the Department of Transportation and Development shall be to
study, administer, construct, improve, promote, and regulate the use of
advanced air mobility systems and to perform such other functions with regard
to public aeronautical facilities and to provide recommendations to the
commissioner of the office of multimodal commerce, secretary of the
Department of Transportation and Development, and both the House
Committee on Transportation, Highways and Public Works, and the Senate
Committee on Transportation, Highways, and Public Works, on policy and
regulatory issues related to the adoption of and advancement of advanced
aviation technologies, including, advanced air mobility, new air traffic control
system, unmanned aircraft systems, urban air mobility, rural air mobility,
universal traffic management, vertiports, and airspace integration technologies.
The legislature directs the secretary and commissioner to establish an advanced
aeronautics director and functions to administer and progress advanced air
mobility and associated functions.
(2) Annually, or as required by the joint committee, the department shall
issue a report regarding the state of unmanned and advanced aeronautics
technologies and shall summarize the progress on all projects previously
approved. This report shall be submitted to the joint committee by February 1
of each year.
(3) The commissioner of the office of multimodal commerce, or his
Page 3 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
designee, shall serve as the department liaison with the Federal Aviation
Administration to address issues with federal, state, and local laws governing
unmanned aircraft systems, unmanned aerial systems, advanced air mobility
and airspace integration.
(4) In performing the functions provided in this Section, the department
may consult with industry stakeholders representing diverse interests in
advanced aviation technologies, including but not limited to representatives
from agriculture, public safety, surveying, oil and gas, unmanned vehicle
systems associations, educational institutions, rotorcraft industry, and airport
management.
H.(1) The department may establish and operate funding and
development programs to support the development, adoption, economic
integration, and promotion of advanced aviation technologies in the state,
including but not limited to:
(a) Grants for research, innovation, infrastructure development, and
workforce training related to unmanned aircraft systems, unmanned aerial
systems, and advanced air mobility.
(b) Pursuit and administration of federal funding opportunities,
including grants from the Federal Aviation Administration, Department of
Homeland Security, or other agencies for drone integration, counter-unmanned
aircraft technologies, and strategic economic and implementation plans.
(2) Such programs shall be developed in alignment with the state's
strategic economic plans, including the Louisiana advanced air mobility
strategic plan, and shall prioritize projects that enhance safety, security,
economic impact, workforce development, and job creation. Funding for these
programs may be derived from legislative appropriations, federal grants,
public-private partnerships, or other available sources. The department shall
include updates on funding program activities, awards, and outcomes in the
annual reports required under Subsection B of this Section.
Page 4 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
(3)(a) Eligibility for program funding shall be determined based on
criteria established by the department, including demonstrated economic
benefit to the state, compliance with federal and state regulations, and
involvement of diverse stakeholders. The office may contract with qualified
consultants for grant writing and program administration services as needed.
(b) Prior to implementing the established criteria and procedures, the
department shall secure the approval of these procedures by the joint
committee in accordance with the administrative procedure act. The procedures
shall be the approved set of guidelines for administering applications through
the program and shall be made available to eligible industry stakeholders.
I. The department may employ or contract for such personnel and
resources as necessary to efficiently perform the functions provided in this
Section.
* * *
§5. Duties of Department of Transportation and Development; aeronautic activities;
exceptions
The secretary and employees of the department designated by him
commissioner of the office of multimodal commerce, or his designee shall
supervise and direct all aeronautic activities and facilities, except those activities
pertaining to aircraft registration, identification, equipment, and enforcement
delegated to the secretary of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections or his
designee. Unless specified, all licenses, orders, rules, and regulations pertaining to
aeronautics shall bear the secretary's commissioner's signature, or the signature of
employees designated by him to sign such licenses, orders, rules, or regulations; and
the secretary commissioner shall insure that all rules and regulations of the
department pertaining to aeronautics are obeyed. He shall direct investigations with
respect to aeronautic activities. He, and any employee designated by him, may
administer oaths when necessary in the discharge of official duties and may affix his
jurat to any license or document pertaining to the promotion or regulation of
Page 5 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
aviation, whether state or federal, concerning which oath is to be made.
§6. Powers and duties of the department; promulgation of rules and regulations
pertaining to aeronautics
* * *
B.(1) Accordingly, the department may prescribe such reasonable rules and
regulations as it deems necessary and advisable:
(a) For the public safety and for the promotion of aeronautics governing the
designing, laying out, location, building, equipping, operation, and use of all airports,
landing fields, or landing strips;
(b) Governing the curriculum, equipment, personnel, and operation and
management of all air instruction;
(c) For the purpose of protecting the health and safety of students receiving
or to receive such instruction of student aviators;
(d)(b) For the public safety and safety of those engaged in aeronautics;
(e)(c) For the promotion of aeronautics governing the establishment, location,
maintenance, and operation of all air markings, air beacons, and other nonfederal
air-navigation facilities.
* * *
§7. Powers and duties of the department; development of aeronautics
The department shall assist in the development of aviation and aviation
aeronautics and aeronautical facilities for the purpose of safeguarding, growing,
and optimizing the interests of those engaged in all phases of the industry and of the
general public and of promoting aeronautics and probatively advancing
multimodal commerce initiatives. Accordingly, the department may expend any
or all the moneys allocated and deposited for the acquisition or enlargement by
purchase, grant, lease, condemnation, or other means, and for the construction,
operation, and maintenance of airports, landing fields, vertiports, advanced air
mobility, electrical vertical takeoff and land facilities, or emergency landing
strips, or of other aeronautic facilities or services for the safety and advancement,
Page 6 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
and promotion of economic improvement and development of aeronautics, which
shall include the joint establishment or provision of such aeronautic facilities or
services in cooperation with other state or federal departments or with other political
subdivisions.
§7.1. Operation and maintenance of aeronautical navigation aids
The Department of Transportation and Development may, subject to
legislative appropriation of sufficient funds, enter into a contract or contracts to
maintain, repair, and use such nonfederal air navigation aids as the department
deems necessary to operate a statewide aeronautical navigation system. A plan for
such a system shall be presented to the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget
for approval before the program is put into effect.
§8. Powers and duties of the department; aeronautics; license; fees
All proposed airports, landing fields, air schools, flying clubs, air beacons,
or other navigation facilities, and landing fields shall first be approved by the
department before they are so used or operated. No airport, landing field, air school,
flying club, vertiport, advanced air mobility facility, air beacon, or other air
navigation facility, except airports and landing fields constructed and operated prior
to July 28, 1936, shall be used or operated without the approval of the department,
and no aircraft, except in case of emergency, shall land upon or take off from any
area other than an airport, landing field, or landing strip. No license, rule, order, or
regulation promulgated under the authority of this Section or of this Chapter shall
apply to airports, landing fields, air beacons, air markings, or other air navigation
facilities owned or operated by the government of the United States or by this state.
The department may issue a certificate of its approval registration in each case and
make reasonable charges therefor.
§9. Powers and duties of the secretary; aeronautics; investigations and hearings
The secretary or any person designated by the secretary commissioner, or
his designee, may hold investigations, inquiries, and hearings concerning matters
covered by the provisions of this Chapter, and all accidents in aeronautics, except for
Page 7 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
aircraft registration, identification, equipment, and enforcement delegated to the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections. All hearings conducted in accordance
with the provisions of this Section shall be open to the public. The secretary,
commissioner and every person designated by him to hold any inquiry,
investigation, or hearing may administer oaths and affirmations, certify to all official
acts, issue subpoenas, compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses, and the
production of papers, books, and documents. In case of failure to comply with any
subpoena or order issued under authority of this Chapter, the secretary or his
authorized representative commissioner, or his designee, may invoke the aid of any
district court which may have jurisdiction in such cases. The court may thereupon
order the witness to comply with the requirements of the subpoena or order to give
evidence touching the matter in question. Any failure to obey the order of said court
may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof.
§10. Powers and duties of the secretary commissioner; exceptions; aeronautics;
investigations and hearings; reports and testimony
To facilitate the making of investigations by the secretary commissioner, or
his designee, in the interest of the public safety and the promotion of aeronautics,
the reports of investigations or hearings, or any part thereof, or any testimony given
thereat, shall not be admitted in evidence or used for any purpose in any suit, action,
or proceeding growing out of any matter referred to in said investigation, hearing,
or report thereof, except in case of criminal or other proceedings instituted by or on
behalf of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections under the provisions of
this Chapter.
* * *
§13. Powers and duties of the department; aeronautics; license rejection
In any case where the department rejects an application for permission
registration to operate or establish an airport, landing field, air school, flying club,
air beacon, or other air navigation facility, or in any case where the department shall
issue any order requiring certain things to be done, it shall set forth its reasons and
Page 8 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
shall state the requirements to be met before such approval registration shall be
given or the order modified or changed. In any case where the department may deem
it necessary it may order the closing of any airport, landing field, or order any air
school, flying club, or air beacon, or other air navigation facility to cease operations
until it complies with the requirements of the department. The secretary
commissioner or any person designated by him, and any officer, state, parish, or
municipal, charged with the duty of enforcing any provisions of this Chapter, may
shall inspect and examine at reasonable hours any premises, and the buildings and
other structures thereon, where airports, landing fields, air schools, flying clubs, air
beacons, vertiports, advanced air mobility facilities, or other air navigation
facilities are operated. Any order made by the department pursuant to this Chapter
shall be served upon the interested person by registered mail or in person before such
order shall become effective.
§14. Appeal from department order or regulation pertaining to aeronautics
Any person against whom an order has been entered may, within ten
calendar days after service, appeal to the district court for the parish in which
property affected by the order is located, for the purpose of having the
reasonableness or lawfulness of the order inquired into or determined.
* * *
§81. Authority of state to own airports; operation of airports by Department of
Public Works
A. The department of public works in on behalf of and in the name of the
state, out of funds available for such purposes, may plan, establish, construct,
enlarge, improve, maintain, equip, operate, regulate, protect, promote, and police
airports and air navigation facilities within the state. The department may construct,
install, equip, maintain, and operate at such airports buildings and other facilities for
the servicing of aircraft or for the accommodation of air travelers., education,
workforce development, economic growth, and public-private initiatives to
leverage public airport assets and infrastructure to attract, develop, and scale
Page 9 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
new and innovative entrants for transportation, logistics, and defense to ensure
alignment with market demand and collaboration of resources across the state.
B. All airports, and other air navigation facilities presently owned or leased
or which may be owned or leased hereafter by the state shall be maintained, managed
and operated by the department, which may charge such fees as it shall see fit for the
use of said airports or air navigation facilities. The department may enter into such
contracts as it shall deem advisable for the sale of aviation fuel and lubricants and
for the operation of other concessions and it may grant leases of every type covering
its hangars, buildings and other real and personal property for such sums and upon
such terms as it may see fit.
C. All revenues earned or produced by the department on account of such
fees, contracts or leases shall be kept separate from all other funds of the state and
shall be deposited in one of the banks of the City of Baton Rouge a FDIC insured
bank subject to withdrawal by the Director of Public Works commissioner, or his
designee, who may use them to pay salaries, to purchase and repair equipment and
to meet other expenses incidental to the operation, development and maintenance of
these facilities.
§82. Acquisition of airports by state; limitations
For the purposes set forth in R.S. 2:81 the department of public works by
purchase, donation, lease, or condemnation may acquire property or an interest
therein, including servitudes in airport hazards or land outside the boundaries of an
airport, necessary to permit safe and efficient operation of the airports, to permit the
removal, obstruction-marking, or obstruction-lighting of airport hazards, or to
prevent the establishment of airport hazards. In like manner, the department may
acquire existing airports and air navigation facilities. The department shall not
acquire any airport or air navigation facility owned or controlled by a political
subdivision of the state without consent first being obtained in writing from the
governing authority of the political subdivision.
§83. Authority of state to dispose of airports
Page 10 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
A. The department may dispose of any airport, air navigation facility, and
portion thereof, or any interest therein. The disposal shall be in accordance with the
laws governing the disposition of property of the state; except that disposal to a
political subdivision of the state or to the United States for aeronautical purposes
may be effected upon such terms and conditions as the department deems in the best
interest of the state.
B. The secretary of the Department of Transportation and Development is
hereby authorized to either transfer the Harry P. Williams Memorial Airport in
Patterson, Louisiana to the St. Mary Parish governing authority or to take whatever
steps are necessary to close the Harry P. Williams Memorial Airport and to dispose
of any interest the state may have in the airport to the St. Mary Parish governing
authority. In addition to the authority hereinabove granted the secretary to transfer
or close the Harry P. Williams Memorial Airport, the secretary may enter into a
cooperative endeavor agreement with the St. Mary Parish governing authority
whereby the state shall retain legal ownership and the St. Mary Parish governing
authority shall operate and maintain the said airport. For a period of one year from
July 14, 1988, the St. Mary Parish governing authority shall not be required to
comply with the provisions of the Public Bid Law for agreements pertaining to
operations, but shall be required to comply with the public bid law for any
purchasing or construction. The secretary is authorized to execute any and all
agreements or documents which may be necessary to accomplish either the transfer
or closure of the airport. The secretary shall have full power and authority to utilize
whatever method he deems in the best interest of the state to accomplish the purposes
of this Section.
§84. Department of public works as agent for political subdivisions in securing
federal aid
The department of public works may act as agent for any municipality or
parish in Louisiana in applying for, accepting, receiving, receipting for, and
disbursing any federal funds or other nonstate funding made available to finance,
Page 11 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
in whole or in part, the planning, acquisition, construction, improvement,
maintenance, or operation of any municipal or parish publicly owned and public-
use airport or air navigation facility.
§85. Authority of municipality or parish to designate department of public works its
agent
The governing authority of any municipality or parish may authorize the
department of public works to act as its agent through a cooperative endeavor
agreement for the purposes set forth in R.S. 2:84.
§86. Authority of department of public works the department to contract with the
United States
The department of public works, as principal for the state and as agent for
any municipality or parish when authorized in writing, may contract with the United
States or its subdivisions as required in connection with a grant or loan of federal
funds for airport or air navigation facilities.
§87. Disposition of funds by department of public works
The department of public works shall deposit in the state treasury funds
received pursuant to R.S. 2:84 and R.S. 2:86. Unless otherwise prescribed by the
authority from which the moneys are received, the The funds shall be kept in a
separate fund designated according to the purposes for which the funds are made
available. The funds shall be held and disbursed by the state for such purposes and
upon such conditions upon which they are made available.
§131. Definition; political subdivisions may acquire airports
A. "Political subdivision" as used in this Part means any parish of this state
as well as any city or county of another adjoining or adjacent state which is
authorized by the law of that state to engage in a joint endeavor for the creation and
operation of an airport district with a political subdivision of this state. In any such
joint endeavor, except to the extent manifestly inconsistent with this Part, the law of
that state will govern the acquisition of lands in such other state and the appointment,
term of service, and compensation for commissioners appointed by or for such city
Page 12 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
or county.
* * *
§135.1. Authority to equip, improve, establish fees and charges, and lease airport
facilities
* * *
F. Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, no municipality,
parish, airport district, airport authority, or other political subdivision may grant a
lease of an entire airport nor may the public be deprived of its rightful, equal, and
uniform use of the airport or landing field or portion thereof, except at such times as
may be required in the interest of public safety, and no exclusive concession, license,
or lease agreement may be made relative to the business of servicing, repairing, or
furnishing of supplies for aircraft or the sale, rental, or leasing of aircraft or flight
instruction. Prospective lessees providing such services must have complied shall
comply with the minimum aeronautical standards established by the lessor.
G. Lease agreements entered into with fixed-base operators prior to June 22,
1978, may be amended so as to provide for an initial or primary term of up to thirty
years and an optional extension terms of up to an additional twenty-five years
without advertising or competitive bidding, with the terms, conditions, fees, and
rentals in such lease agreement to be agreed upon by the authority and the fixed-base
operator.
H. The provisions of this Section shall not apply to the Department of
Military Affairs of the state of Louisiana when leasing airport space at a publicly-
owned airport for military aeronautical purposes.
* * *
J. All leases with a term of five years or more shall contain a provision for
annual periodic adjustments based on a recognized economic index.
* * *
L.(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, leases of
public airport operational space, facilities, equipment, and other airport land and
Page 13 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
improvements at any air facility may be entered into with persons engaged in the
manufacture, storage, maintenance, retrofitting, repair, or maintenance of aircraft in
excess of eighty-eight thousand pounds commonly used by the military services of
the United States or any state, or private person engaged in air carrier operations, or
scheduled commuter operations, or nonscheduled charter of persons, or property, or
mail, for initial terms of up to thirty years, and for optional extension terms of up to
an additional twenty-five years, without advertising or competitive bidding.
* * *
§135.2. Distribution of sales tax revenue
When an airport is located in more than one political subdivision, sales and
use tax revenues generated at the airport shall be distributed to each of the political
subdivisions based upon the acreage contained in each political subdivision in
relation to the total acreage of the airport. The provisions of this Section shall apply
only if the majority of the acreage of such airport is located within the parish of
Jefferson used in accordance with the provisions of the Federal Aviation
Administration policy and procedures concerning the use of airport revenues.
§135.3. Aerial applicators; discrimination prohibited
A. No city, town, or other political subdivision of this state which establishes
airports or landing fields, or which acquires, leases, or sets apart real property for
such purposes shall use any aspect of its authority to discriminate against the use of
such airports or landing fields by any aerial applicator appropriately licensed by the
Department of Agriculture for aerial application of seeds, fertilizers, or pesticides
provided such aerial applicator complies with all regulations as may be promulgated
by the airport owner or operator or in accordance with the provisions of R.S.
2:135.1(N) or (O), the Department of Transportation and Development for the
furtherance of flying safety and protection of the airport environs.
B. In the event that any airport authority objects to the use of its facilities by
a licensed aerial applicator, the airport sponsor shall notify the FAA Flight
Standards district office, the office of agricultural and environmental sciences of
Page 14 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
the Department of Agriculture and Forestry shall upon request send a representative
and the department. The airport sponsor may request a representative from
each agency to inspect and monitor the field prior to, during, and after the use by the
aerial applicator to ascertain if any harmful chemicals and other residues remain as
a result of the use by the aerial applicator. If the commissioner of the Department of
Agriculture and Forestry any one of the agencies determines that the applicator is
or has been in violation, the commissioner shall have the authority to suspend the
offending applicator from further use of the airport or landing strip each agency
shall take the appropriate action to ensure the safety and protection of the
airport operating environment.
* * *
§135.4. Payment methods at airports
* * *
B.(1) All air carrier airports or their authorized agents may collect payment
by credit card, debit card, or a similar approved payment device for any transaction
including but not limited to food and beverage or other consumer-related purchases
in commercial terminal facilities.
(2) No air carrier airport or its authorized agent shall prohibit the use of
United States currency, coin or paper money, for the payment of such transactions.
* * *
§136. Funds for operation may be raised by taxation and otherwise
The local public authorities having power to appropriate monies within the
cities, or other political subdivisions of this state, acquiring, establishing, developing,
operating, maintaining, or controlling airports or landing fields under the provisions
of this Part, may appropriate and cause to be raised by taxation or otherwise in such
political subdivisions, monies sufficient to carry out therein the provisions of this
Part; and may shall use for such purposes monies derived from the airports or
landing fields.
* * *
Page 15 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
§331. Authority to acquire or improve land for industrial parks
A. In addition to any other authority conferred by the constitution and statutes
of this state, any airport district, commission, board or airport authority may acquire,
except by expropriation, and/or improve land for industrial parks within the limits
of the district, commission, board or authority, and may acquire, purchase, construct
or improve industrial plant buildings and necessary property and appurtenances
thereto and lease, by suitable and appropriate contract, to any enterprise locating or
existing within such airport district, commission, board or airport authority, a plant
site, appurtenances and plant building or buildings, either, both or severally. Leases
authorized to be executed hereunder may be entered into by the airport district
without advertisement for bids, provided that any lease having a term of three years
or longer shall first be submitted to and approved by the Board of Commerce and
Industry of the State of Louisiana.
* * *
CHAPTER 3. AIRPORT AERONAUTICAL ZONING
§381. Authority of municipalities and parishes
For promoting safety or the general welfare of the community the governing
body of all incorporated cities, towns and villages and of the parishes may shall
promulgate, administer, and enforce airport zoning regulations limiting the height
of structures and objects of natural growth and otherwise regulate the use of property
in the vicinity of airports and landing fields. Any regulations adopted shall comply
with any United States Department of Transportation, Federal Aviation
Administration, advisory circular, order, regulation, safety guideline,
recommendation, or other official document in order to ensure aviation aeronautical
safety and compatible land use.
§382. Declaration of effect of airport aeronautical hazards
It is hereby found and declared that an airport aeronautical hazard endangers
the lives and property of users of the airport aeronautical facilities and of occupants
of land in its vicinity, and also, if of the obstruction type, in effect reduces the size
Page 16 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
of the area available for landing, taking-off, and maneuvering of aircraft, thus
tending to destroy or impair the utility of the airport aeronautical facility or landing
field and the public health, public safety, or general welfare.
§383. Airport Aeronautical zoning regulations by parishes, cities, towns, villages
and other political subdivisions
Every parish, incorporated city, town, village, or other political subdivision
may shall adopt, administer, and enforce under the police power and in the manner
and upon the conditions prescribed, airport zoning regulations for any airport
aeronautical or landing field within its jurisdiction, which regulations shall divide
the area surrounding the airport aeronautical facility or landing field into zones and
within such zones, specify the land uses permitted and regulate and restrict the height
to which structures and trees may be erected or allowed to grow. In adopting or
revising any such zoning regulations, the political subdivision shall consider, among
other things, the character of the flying operations to be conducted at the airport
aeronautical facility or landing field, the nature of the terrain, the height of existing
structures and trees above the level of the airport aeronautical facility or landing
field, the possibility of lowering or removing existing obstructions, and the views of
the agency of the federal government charged with fostering of civil aeronautics, as
to the aerial approaches necessary to safe flying operations at the airport
aeronautical facility or landing field.
§384. General zoning ordinances; effect or scope; joint boards; extent of jurisdiction
of political subdivisions; reasonable regulations
A. In the event that a political sub-division has adopted, or hereafter adopts,
a general zoning ordinance, regulating, among other things, the height of buildings,
any airport aeronautical zoning regulations adopted for the same area or portion
thereof under this Chapter, may be incorporated in and made a part of such general
zoning regulations, and be administered and enforced in connection therewith, but
such general zoning regulations shall not limit the effectiveness or scope of the
regulations adopted under this Chapter.
Page 17 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
B. Any two or more parishes or other political subdivisions may agree, by
ordinance duly adopted, to create a joint board and delegate to said board the powers
herein conferred to promulgate, administer, and enforce airport zoning regulations
to protect the aerial approaches of any airport aeronautical or landing field located
within the corporate limits of any one or more of said political subdivisions. Such
joint boards shall have as members two representatives appointed by the chief
executive officer of each political subdivision participating in the creation of said
board and a chairman elected by a majority of the members so appointed.
C. The jurisdiction of each parish or other political subdivision is hereby
extended to the promulgation, administering and enforcement of airport zoning
regulations to protect the approaches of any airport or landing field which is owned
by said parish or other political subdivision but located wholly or partially outside
the corporate limits of the parish or other political subdivision. In case of conflict
with any airport aeronautical zoning or regulations promulgated by any other parish
or other political subdivision, the regulations adopted pursuant to this sub-section
shall prevail.
D. All airport aeronautical zoning regulations adopted under this Chapter
shall be reasonable and none shall require the removal, lowering, or other change or
alteration of any structure or tree not conforming to the regulations when adopted or
amended, or otherwise interfere with the continuance of any non-conforming use,
except as provided in R.S. 2:385A.
§385. Permits; variances; obstruction marking and lighting
A. Permits. If airport aeronautical zoning regulations are adopted a system
shall be established by any political subdivision for the granting of permits to
establish or construct new structures and other uses and to replace existing structures
and other uses or make substantial changes therein or substantial repairs thereof. In
any event, before any non-conforming structure or tree may be replaced,
substantially altered or repaired, rebuilt, allowed to grow higher, or replanted, a
permit shall be secured from the administrative agency authorized to administer and
Page 18 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
enforce the regulations, authorizing such replacement, change, or repair. No such
permit shall be granted that would allow the structure or tree in question to be made
higher or become a greater hazard to air navigation than it was when the applicable
regulation was adopted; and whenever the administrative agency determines that a
non-conforming structure or tree has been abandoned or more than eighty percent
torn down, destroyed, deteriorated, or decayed: (1) no permit shall be granted that
would allow the structure or tree to exceed the applicable height limit or otherwise
deviate from the zoning regulations; and (2) whether application is made for a permit
under this Subsection or not, the agency may by appropriate action compel the owner
of the non-conforming structure or tree, at his own expense, to lower, remove,
reconstruct, or equip such object as may be necessary to conform to the regulations
or, if the owner of the non-conforming structure or tree shall neglect or refuse to
comply with such order for ten days after notice thereof, the agency may proceed to
have the object so lowered, removed, reconstructed, or equipped and assess the cost
and expense thereof upon the object or the land whereon it is or was located. Unless
such an assessment is paid within ninety days from the service of notice thereof on
the agent or owner of such object or land, the sum shall bear interest at the rate of ten
percent per annum until paid, and shall be collected in the same manner as are
general taxes. Except as indicated, all applications for permits for replacement,
change or repair of non-conforming uses shall be granted.
B. Variances. Any person desiring to erect any structures, or increase the
height of any structure, or permit the growth of any tree, or otherwise use his
property, in violation of airport aeronautical zoning regulations adopted under this
Chapter, may apply to the board of appeals, as provided in R.S. 2:386 for a variance
from the zoning regulations in question. Such variances shall be allowed where a
literal application or enforcement of the regulations would result in practical
difficulty or unnecessary hardship and the relief granted would not be contrary to the
public interest but do substantial justice and be in accordance with the spirit of the
regulations and this Chapter.
Page 19 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
* * *
§386. Procedure for adoption and administration of regulations; appeals
A. Adoption of zoning regulations. No airport aeronautical zoning
regulations shall be adopted, amended, or changed under this Chapter except by
action of the legislative body of the parish or other political subdivision in question,
or the joint board provided for in R.S. 2:384(B) after a public hearing in relation
thereto, at which parties of interest and citizens shall have an opportunity to be heard.
At least thirty days' notice of the hearing shall be published in an official paper, or
a paper of general circulation, in the political subdivision or subdivisions in which
the airport or landing field is located.
B. Administration of zoning regulations–Administrative agency. The
legislative body of any political subdivision adopting airport aeronautical zoning
regulations under this chapter may delegate the duty of administering and enforcing
such regulations to any administrative agency under its jurisdiction, or may create
a new administrative agency to perform such duty, but such administrative agency
shall not be or include any member of the board of appeals. The duties of such
administrative agency shall include that of hearing and deciding all permits under
R.S. 2:385A, but such agency shall not have or exercise any of the powers delegated
to the board of appeals.
C. Administration of airport aeronautical zoning regulations; board of
appeal. Airport zoning regulations adopted under this Chapter shall provide for a
board of appeals to have and exercise the following powers:
* * *
§390. Short title
This Chapter may be known as the Airport Aeronautical Zoning Law.
§601. Definitions
The following words or terms whenever used or referred to in this Chapter
shall have the following respective meanings unless different meanings clearly
appear from the context:
Page 20 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
* * *
(5) "Air navigation Aeronautical facility" means any facility - other than one
owned and operated by the United States–used in, available for use in, or designed
for use in aid of air navigation, including any structures, mechanisms, lights,
beacons, markers, communicating systems, or other instrumentalities, or devices
used or useful as an aid, or constituting an advantage or convenience, to the safe
taking-off, navigation, and landing of aircraft, or the safe and efficient operation or
maintenance of an airport, and any combination of any or all of such facilities.
(6) "Aeronautical hazard" means any structure, object of natural growth, or
use of land which obstructs the airspace required for the flight of aircraft in landing
or taking-off at an airport or is otherwise hazardous to such landing or taking-off of
aircraft.
* * *
§607. Federal and state aid
* * *
B. An authority is authorized to designate the office of aviation aeronautics
division of the Department of Transportation and Development as its agent to accept,
receive, receipt for, and disburse federal and state monies, and other monies, public
or private, made available by grant or loan or both, to accomplish in whole or in part,
any of the purposes of this Chapter; and to designate the said department as its agent
in contracting for and supervising the planning, acquisition, development,
construction, improvement, maintenance, equipment, or operation of any airport or
other air navigation facility. An authority may enter into an agreement with the said
department prescribing the terms and conditions of the agency in accordance with
such terms and conditions as are prescribed by the United States, if federal money
is involved, and in accordance with the applicable laws of this state. All federal
monies accepted under this Section by the office of aviation aeronautics division
of the Department of Transportation and Development shall be accepted and
transferred or expended by said department upon such terms and conditions as are
Page 21 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
prescribed by the United States. All monies received by the office of aviation
aeronautics division pursuant to this Subsection shall be deposited in the
Transportation Trust Fund of the state treasury and, unless otherwise prescribed
by the agency from which such monies were received, shall be kept in separate funds
designated according to the purposes for which the monies were made available and
held by the state in trust for such purpose.
* * *
§609. Subdivision cooperation
For the purpose of aiding and cooperating in the planning, undertaking,
construction, or operations of airports or air navigation facilities pursuant to the
provisions of this Chapter, any subdivision for which an authority has been created
may, upon such terms, with or without consideration, as it may determine:
* * *
(2) Provide that all or a portion of the taxes or funds available or to become
available to, or required by law to be used by, the subdivision for airport purposes,
be transferred or paid directly to the airport authority as such funds become available
to the subdivision; and unless otherwise prescribed by the agency from which the
monies were received, shall be kept in separate funds designated according to
the purposes for which the monies were made available and held in trust for
such purpose.
* * *
CHAPTER 7. AIRPORT CONSTRUCTION AND DEVELOPMENT
PRIORITY PROGRAM
§801. Definitions
As used in this Chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the
following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Airport authority" means the owner of any airport or landing field,
vertiport, advanced air mobility facility, or the governing authority of any airport
district.
Page 22 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
(2) "Airport construction and development priority program" means the
priority list of projects submitted by the department and approved by the joint
committee pursuant to this Chapter Airport development program" means a
program of infrastructure improvements and development projects of
qualifying airports submitted by the department and approved by the Senate
and House committees on transportation, highway and public works pursuant
to this Chapter.
(3) "Construction or development project" means a program of construction
or development, either new or continuing, that will be planned and implemented with
the primary goal of improving aviation aeronautical activities in the state.
(4) "Department" means the Department of Transportation and Development,
office of multimodal commerce.
(5) "Joint committee" means legislative committees including the House
Committee on Transportation, Highways and Public Works and the Senate
Committee on Transportation, Highways and Public Works, functioning as a joint
legislative committee.
(6) "Sponsor" means any state agency, city, town, parish, airport authority,
airport district, airport commission or other political subdivision which owns,
leases, or controls any airport, landing field, landing strip, seaplane base, helipad, or
aid to air navigation.
§802. Methodology for airport project evaluation
A.(1) Applications for funding of any airport construction or development
project may be submitted by any airport authority, except as provided in R.S. 2:806.
However, to be eligible for state funding from the Airport Construction and
Development Priority Program for an airport project, an airport authority located in
a political subdivision which has adopted airport zoning regulations, shall certify to
the Department of Transportation and Development that the political subdivision's
regulations are in compliance with United States Department of Transportation,
Federal Aviation Administration, advisory circulars, orders, regulations, safety
Page 23 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
guidelines, recommendations, or other official documents that have been issued for
the purpose of ensuring aviation safety and compatible land use. Equal consideration
shall be given to rural aviation and commercial urban aviation. Applications shall be
made to the Department of Transportation and Development by November first of
each year, for consideration of funding in the following fiscal year. Applications
submitted in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter shall not be subject to
the provisions of R.S. 39:104, 111, 114, and 121. Information to be provided in the
application shall include but not be limited to the following:
(a) Description of the project and demonstration of immediate need for the
project.
(b) Preliminary project design and cost estimate.
(c) Description of project area.
A.(1) Applications for state funding of any airport construction or
development project shall be submitted by any airport sponsor. To be eligible
for state funding from the Airport Development Program for an airport project,
an airport sponsor located in a political subdivision which has adopted airport
aeronautical zoning regulations, shall certify to the Department of
Transportation and Development that the political subdivision's regulations are
in compliance with United States Department of Transportation, Federal
Aviation Administration, advisory circulars, orders, regulations, safety
guidelines, recommendations, or other official documents that have been issued
for the purpose of ensuring aeronautical safety and compatible land use. Final
applications submitted in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter shall
not be subject to the provisions of R.S. 39:104, 111, 114, and 121. Information
to be provided in the application shall be submitted in accordance with the
Louisiana Aeronautical Development Manual.
(2) Project applications shall not be subjected to formal review and
evaluation until the information required in the application has been submitted.
(3) Projects being funded on August 15, 2010, and projects on the proposed
Page 24 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
Airport Priority Program for FY 2010-2011 on August 15, 2010, are exempt from
the requirements of this Subsection.
B. Applications shall be reviewed by the department and any other
appropriate state agencies which meet the provisions of R.S. 2:802(C) and meet
the eligibility requirements within the evaluation procedures, shall be included
in the Airport Development Program.
C. If the sponsor, or any local unit of government obtains ninety percent
or more funding for an aeronautical project, from federal sources or from
sources other than state funds, the legislature shall give priority to funding the
local match amount necessary for the aeronautical project.
D. Procedures for application review and evaluation shall be developed by
the department. Prior to implementing the review and evaluation procedures, the
department shall secure the approval of these procedures by the joint committee in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. The procedures and a shall be
approved by a set of guidelines for completing project applications shall be made
available to eligible airport authorities prior to September 1, 1989.
E.(1) The commissioner of multimodal commerce, or his designee, shall,
for the purpose of administering the provisions of this Chapter, divide and
classify the airports of the Louisiana airport system by type, volume and kind
of traffic, operational status, federal status, federal obligation requirements,
purpose, or otherwise to ensure a system that is safe, efficient, and complies
with state and federal safety standards.
(2) The commissioner of multimodal commerce shall classify airports
comprising of functional operations and shall establish current standards for
their functional classification. It shall undertake a continuing study of the needs
of the various airports for the purpose of maintaining safety standards and shall
update such study every two years with the most current information and data
to support funding allocations and justify overall development objectives.
(3) The department shall prepare and update a master plan to support
Page 25 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
and sustain the justification for the classification and characterization of the
Louisiana integrated airport system requirements to be updated every two
years in coordination with the federal national plan of integrated airport
systems report by the federal aviation administration for program inclusion.
(a) Every two years the department shall provide to the legislative
committees a report on the classification and characterization of the airport
system.
(b) The department shall promulgate rules, procedures, and
implementation policies and publish them in the Louisiana Aeronautical
Development Manual in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
§803. Priority list of projects; public hearings; final program Proposed Program of
Airport Development
A. Prior to the convening of each regular session of the legislature, beginning
with the 1990 Regular Session, the department shall prepare and shall furnish the
priority list to the joint committee which shall hold a public hearing or hearings for
the purpose of reviewing the priority list of projects for the coming fiscal year. Prior
to each hearing, the department shall publish the appropriate official notice in the
necessary journals. Subsequent to the joint committee hearing and prior to the
convening of the regular session, the department shall prepare the final construction
program for the coming fiscal year for submission to the joint committee. When this
final construction program, as approved by the joint committee, is presented to the
legislature for funding for the coming fiscal year, the legislature shall not add any
projects to this final construction program except as provided in Subsection B of this
Section.
B. If the governing authority of an airport authority district, parish, or of any
local unit of government obtains ninety percent or more funding for an airport, or for
an airport project, from federal sources or from sources other than state funds, the
legislature shall give priority to funding the remaining amount necessary for the
airport or for the airport project, even if the project is not on the priority list of
Page 26 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
projects.
A. Each year, the department shall submit to the legislative committees
an airport development program to be commenced in the ensuing fiscal year.
B. The department shall provide to the Senate and House committees on
transportation, highways and public works a supplemental program proposed
to be commenced which are in various stages of planning.
§804. Proposed program of construction Airport Development Program; public
hearings; final program
A. Each year, beginning with the fiscal year commencing in 1990, the
department shall submit to the joint committee an airport construction or
development priority program to be commenced in the ensuing fiscal year, which
shall be based upon the anticipated revenues to be appropriated by the legislature,
and listed in an order of priority of the projects herein.
B. The department also shall provide to the joint committee annually a
supplemental list of projects proposed to be commenced within the ensuing four
years which are in various stages of planning and preparation. The supplemental list
shall be subject to change by the department until the department finally approves
each project for construction.
A. Prior to the convening of each regular session of the legislature, the
department shall prepare and shall furnish the recommended list of proposed
projects to the legislative committees which shall hold a public hearing or
hearings for the purpose of reviewing the program applications for the coming
fiscal year. Prior to each hearing, the department shall publish the appropriate
official notice in the official journal of the state. Subsequent to the committee
hearing and prior to the convening of the regular session, the department shall
prepare the final airport development program for the coming fiscal year for
submission to the Senate and House committees on transportation, highways
and public works. When this final airport development program, as approved
by both committees, is presented to the legislature for funding for the coming
Page 27 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
fiscal year, the legislature shall not add any projects to this final airport
development program.
B. The legislature declares it to be in the public interest that a program
for development of airport infrastructure be utilized to develop the airport
development program that accomplishes the following:
(1) Prioritizes, above all else, transparency to the public, accuracy, and
efficiency of program delivery.
(2) Brings and maintains the state airport system into a good state of
repair and optimizes the efficiency and economic growth of airport facilities.
(3) Improves safety for aeronautical users and communities.
(4) Supports resiliency in the multimodal transportation system.
(5) Fosters diverse economic development and job growth, international
and domestic commerce, and tourism.
(6) Fosters and encourages multimodal connectivity.
(7) Ensures airport safety compliance for the public interest and
provides a system of compliance review and adherence.
(8) Encourages use and adoption of advanced and innovative
technologies.
(9) Ensures a right-sized system of airports to enhance and grow the
state economy.
§805. Projects undertaken by the department
A. After adoption of the department's recommendations by the joint
committee Senate and House committees on transportation, highways and public
works, the approved list of projects program shall be forwarded to the department
for implementation subject to the limitation of appropriated appropriation of funds.
The department shall not delete, add, or substitute any projects for those approved
by the joint committee, revise any projects applications approved by the
committees, except as provided in R.S. 2:806; however, the secretary of the
department may the commissioner of multimodal commerce, or his designee, at
Page 28 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
his discretion, authorize projects to be undertaken and financed due to an emergency
out of the secretary's emergency fund. At least semiannually, or as often as required
by the joint committee, the department shall summarize and report the progress to
date on all projects previously approved and shall submit a recapitulation of all
emergency projects for the preceding six-month period, outlining the nature of the
emergency and the cost of each project.
B. No airport project shall be undertaken by the department involving
Transportation Trust Fund appropriations except those included in the approved
program listing for that fiscal year with the exception of projects undertaken and
financed out of the secretary's emergency fund through funds recovered from
completed projects and/or nonactive projects that have been canceled, closed,
audited, or finalized.
§806. Commencement of projects; substitutions; New Orleans International Airport
A. The projects planned for the year for which appropriations have been
made shall have six months upon the appropriation to be commenced in that year;
however, if a project cannot be commenced within six months of the year for which
it is planned, the secretary of the department shall file with the project records a
public statement as to the factors causing the delay, and the next priority project shall
be substituted therefor. When the delaying factors have been overcome, the delayed
project shall be placed in the highest priority for the next ensuing fiscal year.
Unresolved debt resulting from project cost overruns approved by the department
shall be paid from current year funds. Any remaining debt shall be given top priority
in the following year. Funds allocated for each project shall remain so allocated until
the project is completed and the project costs are liquidated appropriations have
been made, the department shall cancel the project. The sponsor shall submit
a new application for the project which shall then be placed in the airport
development program and re-evaluated for inclusion.
B. The New Orleans International Airport or its successor shall be prohibited
from participating in the airport priority program for five consecutive years from the
Page 29 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
first fiscal year in which such priority program is funded by the legislature only if,
as, and when House Bill No. 80 of the 1989 Regular Session of the Legislature of
Louisiana is finally adopted and approved by the electorate.*
§807. Allocation, reallocation of funds; deposit to Transportation Trust Fund
A. The Transportation Trust Fund shall be one of the source of state funds
provided for any airport aeronautical project on the priority list airport
development program commenced pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter. Prior
to the commencement of any work, the department shall require the presiding officer
or owner of each airport authority sponsor involved in a project to execute an
agreement and statement of sponsorship, and compliance certification which
includes but is not limited to an agreement to assume all maintenance and operation
and utility service costs for the project as may be required without cost to the state.
B. Any monies allocated for any project not needed for said project may be
reallocated for the completion of any other project or projects specified. Any monies
not needed for the completion of said projects shall be deposited in and credited to
the Transportation Trust Fund, for reallocation to the Airport Construction and
Development Priority Airport Development Program.
§808. Preparation of plans and specifications; letting of bids for construction;
supervision of construction
The department may prepare or contract for the necessary plans and
specifications, may let the contract for bid, and may supervise the construction of the
project.
§809. Inspection
A. The department may approve the engineering, and construction, and
design-build plans for any proposed airport projects that are prepared by consultant
or contract engineers for any recipient airport authority sponsor. The department
may inspect the construction of a project at any time to assure project compliance.
B. The department may inspect a complete project with the consultant or
contract engineer. The sponsor or contract engineer shall notify the department
Page 30 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
in writing at least seven business days prior to the inspection being conducted.
The sponsor or contract engineer shall notify the department in writing at least seven
business days prior to the inspection being conducted. The sponsor shall certify to
the department as a condition of grant acceptance that construction is in accordance
with plans and specifications. The department may inspect a completed project at
any time to assure that the project is being maintained in accordance with project
specifications and agreements.
* * *
§811. Audit of distribution to recipient airport authorities sponsors
The monies distributed to the recipient authorities sponsors shall be audited
by the legislative auditor or a certified public accountant at least biennially pursuant
to R.S. 24:513(A) and shall issue and distribute all audit reports pursuant to R.S.
24:516(A). To the extent that funds available to the legislative auditor permit, the
audits of each recipient airport authority sponsor of the use of the monies shall
include an investigation of any failure to comply with the recommendations for
planning, design, and construction adopted by the department. The recipient airport
authority sponsor shall certify annually to the legislative auditor that the funds made
available under this Chapter have been expended in accordance with the standards
established by law.
§812. Report of any misuse of funds
If the legislative auditor determines that any expenditures by the recipient
airport authority sponsor have not been made in accordance with this Chapter, he
shall promptly report the facts of such expenditure to the Legislative Audit Advisory
Council. The council shall make further investigation of the matter as it deems
necessary.
§813. Misuse of funds; withholding of distribution; notification of district attorney
A.(1) If, on the basis of the report of the legislative auditor, or from its own
investigation, the Legislative Audit Advisory Council, hereinafter referred to as the
"council", determines that there has been a misuse by a recipient airport authority
Page 31 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
sponsor of funds from the program, it shall then determine whether a partial or total
withholding of the authority's sponsor's appropriation for any remaining portion of
the current fiscal year shall be necessary. Should the council determine that it is
necessary to withhold all or any part of the authority's sponsor's appropriation, the
council shall send notification of its determination to the co-chairmen of the joint
committee and to each member of the legislature who represents any portion of the
authority sponsor.
(2) If, thirty days after the members of the legislature and the co-chairmen
of the Senate and House committees on transportation, highways, and public
works, are notified, the council determines that the misuse has not yet ceased, the
council shall send a resolution instructing the state treasurer and the department to
immediately suspend distributions to the airport authority sponsor of funds
appropriated for the program. The suspension of funds shall remain in effect until the
Legislative Audit Advisory Council verifies, in writing, to the state treasurer and the
department that the offending authority sponsor is again in compliance with this
Chapter. Such written verification shall be given when the legislative auditor
certifies to the council that, to the best of his knowledge, the authority sponsor is in
compliance with this Chapter or, in the absence of said certification, when the
council determines that the authority sponsor is in compliance with this Chapter.
Upon receipt of the council's written verification, the state treasurer and the
department shall reinstate the distribution of funds and distribute all funds
previously withheld to the affected recipient airport authority sponsor.
(3) The council shall report any action it has taken with regard to the
suspension of funds to the joint committee Senate and House committees on
transportation, highways and public works and the legislature at the next regular
session, along with any recommendations it may have for forfeiture of suspended
funds by those authorities sponsors which are still in noncompliance with this
Chapter. Forfeiture of funds can be authorized only by the legislature.
B. In any case where there has been a determination made by the council that
Page 32 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
there has been a misuse by a recipient airport authority sponsor of funds
appropriated for the program, the council shall furnish a copy of the written
resolution directing the state treasurer to withhold funds to the district attorney of the
parish or parishes where the misuse of funds occurred. The district attorney shall,
within thirty days, advise the chairman of the council as to action he has taken or
proposes to take in connection with the misuse of funds cited in the resolution.
Where future action is proposed by the district attorney, the council shall set a date
for receipt of further advice in the matter. Where such advice is not forthcoming
from the district attorney, or where it is evident that suitable action has not been
taken, the council shall report the matter to the joint committee and the legislature
at its next regular session for whatever action the joint committee and the legislature
deems advisable under the circumstances.
§814. Project development; schedule
When aviation aeronautical projects receiving funding from the Federal
Aviation Administration are being negotiated by the department, the department, the
local sponsor, the department, the sponsor of the project, and the Federal Aviation
Administration shall agree upon an official schedule of project development which
shall set the project time schedule. If the department is unable to complete timely
reviews as stipulated within the schedule, for reasons solely in the control of the
department, the project shall be deemed to be approved in accordance with the
standard process of the Federal Aviation Administration.
§901. Creation and Program administration
The General Aviation and Reliever Airport Maintenance Grant Program is
hereby created within the division of aviation aeronautics of the Department of
Transportation and Development for the purpose of providing for airport basic
airside airport maintenance to assist Louisiana general aviation and reliever airports
and to enhance their safety airports with the cost of maintenance materials and
implementation that enhance their safety of aircraft operations.
§902. Grant eligibility
Page 33 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
A. Grants made through the program shall be limited to Louisiana general
aviation and reliever airports as identified in the airport system in accordance
with R.S. 2:802 and 804 and shall be awarded to those projects applications which
address basic airside airport maintenance needs and attempt to enhance safety of
aircraft operations and infrastructure issues at existing airport facilities.
B. Each successful grant applicant shall provide a like match in funds from
other sources sponsor sources other than state funds. All matching funds must be
available to the program after the date of the grant award and funds spent prior to the
grant award shall not be considered in fulfillment of the match requirement.
C. (1) Except as provided in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, grants shall be
limited to not more than ten thousand dollars per airport per fiscal year.
(2) Applications for additional grant money funding by an airport that has
been awarded the maximum amount in a fiscal year may be considered for additional
funding after April thirtieth of a fiscal year if all of the applications for grants which
have been submitted for the fiscal year have been accepted or rejected and any funds
in the grant program remain unallocated for the fiscal year.
D. Funding through the grant program shall be subject to but not limited to
the following criteria:
(1) The availability of funds.
(2) A comparative needs analysis of requested projects applications as
determined by the division of aviation aeronautics.
(3) Demonstrated safety benefits to be derived from the project application.
§903. Rules and regulations
A. The department shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement this
Chapter which shall include but not necessarily be limited to:
(1) Project Application submission.
(2) Project Application evaluation, including but not limited to financial
feasibility.
(3) Program administration.
Page 34 of 37
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1491 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 514
(4) Prioritization of projects.
(5) Grant awards.
(6) Airport Certification program.
(7) Airport compliance evaluation.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 2:135.1(N)(3) and 1001 through 1004 are hereby repealed.